Hawaii statutes.
§634-36 Manner of service under sections
634-33 to 35. [(a)] When service of summons is provided for by section
634-33, 634-34, or 634-35, service shall be made by service upon the defendant
personally by any person authorized to serve process in the place in which the
defendant may be found or appointed by the court for the purpose, or sent by
certified, registered, or express mail, postage prepaid, with return receipt
requested, by the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney to the defendant. The
plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney shall file the return of the serving
officer or an affidavit showing that the copy of summons and complaint were
served as aforesaid or sent by certified, registered, or express mail as
aforesaid, and in the latter case the return receipt signed by the defendant
shall be filed with the affidavit. The service shall be complete upon delivery
of the required papers to the defendant outside the State, personally or by
mail as provided.

[(b)] If the defendant cannot be found to
serve or mail the summons and the facts shall appear by affidavit or otherwise
to the satisfaction of the court, it may order that service be made by
publication of summons in at least one newspaper published in the State and
having a general circulation in the circuit in which the action has been
instituted, in such manner and for such time as the court may order, but not
less than once each week in four successive weeks, the last publication to be
not less than twenty-one days prior to the return date stated therein unless a
different time is prescribed by order of the court. [L 1972, c 89, §2A(o); HRS
§634-72; ren HRS §634-36; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; am L
1984, c 209, §4; am L 1985, c 68, §29; am L 1987, c 283, §62; am L 1990, c 29,
§1]

Rules of Court

Publication of summons, see HRCP rule 4.

Case Notes

Section 657-18 did not apply to toll the no-fault statute of
limitations where a nonresident motorist defendant was at all times subject to
the jurisdiction of Hawaii's courts and amenable to service of process under
its long-arm statutes as set forth in §634-33 and this section. 89 H. 1, 967
P.2d 1059 (1998).

Defendant, who was a citizen and resident of Japan, was
amenable to service by publication pursuant to this section where defendant's
address was unknown, and such service would not have been pre-empted by the
Hague Convention. 99 H. 488, 57 P.3d 413 (2002).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next